Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202279-1315
Nebraska Educational Telecommunications Commission; membership; appointment; term; expenses.

(1) The Nebraska Educational Telecommunications Commission shall be composed of eleven members, as follows: (a) The Commissioner of Education or his or her designee; (b) the President of the University of Nebraska or his or her designee; (c) a representative of the state colleges; (d) a representative of the community colleges; (e) a representative of private educational institutions of the State of Nebraska; and (f) six members of the general public, none of whom shall be associated with any of the institutions listed in subdivisions (a) through (e) of this subsection and two of whom shall be from each congressional district. No more than four of the members shall be actively engaged in the teaching profession or administration of an educational institution.

(2) The members described in subdivisions (1)(c) through (1)(f) of this section shall be appointed by the Governor with the approval of the Legislature for terms of four years, and the term of the member described in subdivision (1)(d) of this section shall be the same as the term of the member described in subdivision (1)(c) of this section. Vacancies shall be filled by the Governor for the unexpired term. The commission shall be nonpolitical in character, and selection of the members of the commission shall be made on a nonpolitical basis. No member of the commission shall receive any compensation for his or her services. Reimbursement shall be provided for reasonable and necessary expenses incurred in attending scheduled meetings of the commission as provided in sections 81-1174 to 81-1177.

If the Commissioner of Education is unable to attend a commission meeting, his or her designee is authorized to act on behalf of the commissioner, and if the President of the University of Nebraska or his or her designee is unable to attend a commission meeting, the Executive Vice President and Provost for academic affairs is authorized to act on his or her behalf.

Laws 1963, c. 468, § 2, p. 1497;

Laws 1965, c. 534, § 1, p. 1679;

Laws 1969, c. 741, § 1, p. 2794;

Laws 1969, c. 742, § 1, p. 2795;

Laws 1981, LB 204, § 161;

Laws 1984, LB 645, § 3;

Laws 1988, LB 939, § 1;

Laws 1991, LB 43, § 1;

Laws 1994, LB 854, § 1;

R.S.1943, (1994), § 79-2102;

Laws 1996, LB 900, § 971;

Laws 1997, LB 347, § 52;

Laws 2015, LB525, § 26.